Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 43. a. Direct the institutions of higher education governed by the board to waive all tuition and mandatory fees for a veteran, as defined in section 35.1, who has a permanent service-connected disability rating of one hundred percent as certified by the United States department of veterans affairs and who applies to and is admitted for enrollment at the institution. b. A veteran shall only be eligible for a waiver under this subsection if the veteran is not eligible for or has exhausted any other available federal or state sources of financial assistance for such tuition and fees, including but not limited to the Pell grant program and education benefits from the United States department of veterans affairs. The institution shall prorate the waiver each semester to cover any difference House File 2491, p. 2 between other federal or state financial assistance obtained by the veteran and the amount of such tuition and fees. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2491, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor